Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2199
Disapproval of sale; refund.

If the sales are disapproved the money paid and the securities given must be returned to the persons respectively entitled thereto.

R.S.1867, Code § 832, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 8315;

C.S.1922, § 9267;

C.S.1929, § 20-2199;

R.S.1943, § 25-2199.

Money belongs to bidder until sale is confirmed, and he has right to follow it wherever he can trace it and recover it from one who had knowledge of the facts. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Farmers & Merchants State Bank of McCook, 125 Neb. 437, 250 N.W. 553 (1933).